Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Compensation Proceedings.

Collateral references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d, Workmen’s Compensation, §§ 488-726.

100 C.J.S., Workmen’s Compensation, §§ 415-781

101 C.J.S., Workmen’s Compensation, §§ 782-825, 849-875, 915, 916.

Application for, or receipt of, unemployment compensation benefits as affecting claim for workers’ compensation. 96 ALR2d 941.

Right of health or accident insurer to intervene in workers’ compensation proceeding to recover benefits previously paid to claimant or beneficiary. 38 ALR4th 355.

Sec. 23.30.100.
Notice of injury or death.

Notice of an injury or death in respect to which compensation is payable under this chapter shall be given within 30 days after the date of such injury or death to the employer.

The notice must be in a format prescribed by the director and contain the name and address of the employee, a statement of the time, place, nature, and cause of the injury or death, and authority to release records of medical treatment for the injury or death, and be signed by the employee or by a person on behalf of the employee, or, in case of death, by a person claiming to be entitled to compensation for the death or by a person on behalf of that person.

Notice shall be given to the employer by delivering it to the employer or by sending it by mail addressed to the employer at the employer’s last known place of business. If the employer is a partnership, the notice may be given to a partner, if a limited liability company, the notice may be given to a member, or if a corporation, the notice may be given to an agent or officer on whom legal process may be served or who is in charge of the business in the place where the injury occurred.

Failure to give notice does not bar a claim under this chapter

if the employer, an agent of the employer in charge of the business in the place where the injury occurred, or the carrier had knowledge of the injury or death and the board determines that the employer or carrier has not been prejudiced by failure to give notice;

if the board excuses the failure on the ground that for some satisfactory reason notice could not be given;

unless objection to the failure is raised before the board at the first hearing of a claim for compensation in respect to the injury or death.

History.

(§ 11 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 37 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For presumptions that apply when the board excuses a failure under paragraph (d)(2), see AS

23.30.120(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, in (a), deleted “to the board and” following “such injury or death”; in (b), substituted “in a format prescribed by the director and” for “in writing,” following “The notice must be”; in (c), deleted “to the board by delivering it or sending it by mail, addressed to the board’s office, and” following “Notice shall be given”, and inserted “if a limited liability company, the notice may be given to a member,” following “given to a partner”, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 23.30.105.
Time for filing of claims.

The right to compensation for disability under this chapter is barred unless a claim for it is filed within two years after the employee has knowledge of the nature of the employee’s disability and its relation to the employment and after disablement. However, the maximum time for filing the claim in any event other than arising out of an occupational disease shall be four years from the date of injury, and the right to compensation for death is barred unless a claim therefor is filed within one year after the death, except that, if payment of compensation has been made without an award on account of the injury or death, a claim may be filed within two years after the date of the last payment of benefits under AS

23.30.041

,

23.30.180

,

23.30.185

,

23.30.190

,

23.30.200

, or

23.30.215

. It is additionally provided that, in the case of latent defects pertinent to and causing compensable disability, the injured employee has full right to claim as shall be determined by the board, time limitations notwithstanding.

Failure to file a claim within the period prescribed in (a) of this section is not a bar to compensation unless objection to the failure is made at the first hearing of the claim in which all parties in interest are given reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard.

If a person who is entitled to compensation under this chapter is mentally incompetent or a minor, the provisions of (a) of this section are not applicable so long as the person has no guardian or other authorized representative, but are applicable in the case of a person who is mentally incompetent or a minor from the date of appointment of a guardian or other representative, or, in the case of a minor, if no guardian is appointed before the person becomes of age, from the date the person becomes of age.

If recovery is denied to a person, in a suit brought at law or in admiralty to recover damages in respect to injury or death, on the ground that the person was an employee and that the defendant is an employer within the meaning of this chapter and that the employer has secured compensation to the employee under this chapter, the limitation of time prescribed in (a) of this section begins to run only from the date of termination of the suit.

History.

(§ 12 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 42 SLA 1962; am § 19 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 105 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.106.
[Renumbered as AS 23.30.011.]

Sec. 23.30.107.
Release of information.

Upon written request, an employee shall provide written authority to the employer, carrier, rehabilitation specialist, or reemployment benefits administrator to obtain medical and rehabilitation information relative to the employee’s injury. The request must include notice of the employee’s right to file a petition for a protective order with the division and must be served by certified mail to the employee’s address on the notice of injury or by hand delivery to the employee. This subsection may not be construed to authorize an employer, carrier, rehabilitation specialist, or reemployment benefits administrator to request medical or other information that is not applicable to the employee’s injury.

Medical or rehabilitation records, and the employee’s name, address, social security number, electronic mail address, and telephone number contained on any record, in an employee’s file maintained by the division or held by the board or the commission are not public records subject to public inspection and copying under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

. This subsection does not prohibit

the reemployment benefits administrator, the division, the board, the commission, or the department from releasing medical or rehabilitation records in an employee’s file, without the employee’s consent, to a physician providing medical services under AS

23.30.095(k)

or

23.30.110(g)

, a party to a claim filed by the employee, or a governmental agency; or

the quoting or discussing of medical or rehabilitation records contained in an employee’s file during a hearing on a claim for compensation or in a decision or order of the board or commission.

The division may not assemble, or provide information respecting, individual records for commercial purposes that are outside the scope of this chapter.

An employee may elect to authorize the disclosure of the employee’s name, address, social security number, electronic mail address, and telephone number contained in a record described in (b) of this section by signing a declaration on a form provided by the division.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 6 ch 75 SLA 1995; am § 11 ch 105 SLA 2000; am §§ 38, 39 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 61 SLA 2008; am § 23 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

23.30.097

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2000, “AS 40.25” was substituted for “AS 09.25” to reflect the renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25” in the introductory language of (b).

Sec. 23.30.108.
Prehearings on discovery matters; objections to requests for release of information; sanctions for noncompliance.

If an employee objects to a request for written authority under AS

23.30.107

, the employee must file a petition with the board seeking a protective order within 14 days after service of the request. If the employee fails to file a petition and fails to deliver the written authority as required by AS

23.30.107

within 14 days after service of the request, the employee’s rights to benefits under this chapter are suspended until the written authority is delivered.

If a petition seeking a protective order is filed, the board shall set a prehearing within 21 days after the filing date of the petition. At a prehearing conducted by the board’s designee, the board’s designee has the authority to resolve disputes concerning the written authority. If the board or the board’s designee orders delivery of the written authority and if the employee refuses to deliver it within 10 days after being ordered to do so, the employee’s rights to benefits under this chapter are suspended until the written authority is delivered. During any period of suspension under this subsection, the employee’s benefits under this chapter are forfeited unless the board, or the court determining an action brought for the recovery of damages under this chapter, determines that good cause existed for the refusal to provide the written authority.

At a prehearing on discovery matters conducted by the board’s designee, the board’s designee shall direct parties to sign releases or produce documents, or both, if the parties present releases or documents that are likely to lead to admissible evidence relative to an employee’s injury. If a party refuses to comply with an order by the board’s designee or the board concerning discovery matters, the board may impose appropriate sanctions in addition to any forfeiture of benefits, including dismissing the party’s claim, petition, or defense. If a discovery dispute comes before the board for review of a determination by the board’s designee, the board may not consider any evidence or argument that was not presented to the board’s designee, but shall determine the issue solely on the basis of the written record. The decision by the board on a discovery dispute shall be made within 30 days. The board shall uphold the designee’s decision except when the board’s designee’s determination is an abuse of discretion.

If the employee files a petition seeking a protective order to recover medical and rehabilitation information that has been provided but is not related to the employee’s injury, and the board or the board’s designee grants the protective order, the board or the board’s designee granting the protective order shall direct the division, the board, the commission, and the parties to return to the employee, as soon as practicable following the issuance of the protective order, all medical and rehabilitation information, including copies, in their possession that is unrelated to the employee’s injury under the protective order.

If the board or the board’s designee limits the medical or rehabilitation information that may be used by the parties to a claim, either by an order on the record or by issuing a written order, the division, the board, the commission, and a party to the claim may request and an employee shall provide or authorize the production of medical or rehabilitation information only to the extent of the limitations of the order. If information has been produced that is outside of the limits designated in the order, the board or the board’s designee shall direct the party in possession of the information to return the information to the employee as soon as practicable following the issuance of the order.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 16, 2010, added (d) and (e).

Sec. 23.30.110.
Procedure on claims.

Subject to the provisions of AS

23.30.105

, a claim for compensation may be filed with the board in accordance with its regulations at any time after the first seven days of disability following an injury, or at any time after death, and the board may hear and determine all questions in respect to the claim.

Within 10 days after a claim is filed the board, in accordance with its regulations, shall notify the employer and any other person, other than the claimant, whom the board considers an interested party that a claim has been filed. The notice may be served personally upon the employer or other person, or sent by registered mail.

Before a hearing is scheduled, the party seeking a hearing shall file a request for a hearing together with an affidavit stating that the party has completed necessary discovery, obtained necessary evidence, and is prepared for the hearing. An opposing party shall have 10 days after the hearing request is filed to file a response. If a party opposes the hearing request, the board or a board designee shall within 30 days of the filing of the opposition conduct a pre-hearing conference and set a hearing date. If opposition is not filed, a hearing shall be scheduled no later than 60 days after the receipt of the hearing request. The board shall give each party at least 10 days’ notice of the hearing, either personally or by certified mail. After a hearing has been scheduled, the parties may not stipulate to change the hearing date or to cancel, postpone, or continue the hearing, except for good cause as determined by the board. After completion of the hearing the board shall close the hearing record. If a settlement agreement is reached by the parties less than 14 days before the hearing, the parties shall appear at the time of the scheduled hearing to state the terms of the settlement agreement. Within 30 days after the hearing record closes, the board shall file its decision. If the employer controverts a claim on a board-prescribed controversion notice and the employee does not request a hearing within two years following the filing of the controversion notice, the claim is denied.

At the hearing the claimant and the employer may each present evidence in respect to the claim and may be represented by any person authorized in writing for that purpose.

The order rejecting the claim or making the award, referred to in this chapter as a compensation order, shall be filed in the office of the board, and a copy of it shall be sent by registered mail to the claimant and to the employer at the last known address of each.

An award of compensation for disability may be made after the death of an injured employee.

An injured employee claiming or entitled to compensation shall submit to the physical examination by a duly qualified physician which the board may require. The place or places shall be reasonably convenient for the employee. The physician or physicians as the employee, employer, or carrier may select and pay for may participate in an examination if the employee, employer, or carrier so requests. Proceedings shall be suspended and no compensation may be payable for a period during which the employee refuses to submit to examination.

The filing of a hearing request under (c) of this section suspends the running of the two-year time period specified in (c) of this section. However, if the employee subsequently requests a continuance of the hearing and the request is approved by the board, the granting of the continuance renders the request for hearing inoperative, and the two-year time period specified in (c) of this section continues to run again from the date of the board’s notice to the employee of the board’s granting of the continuance and of its effect. If the employee fails to again request a hearing before the conclusion of the two-year time period in (c) of this section, the claim is denied.

History.

(§ 18 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 12 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 20 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 105 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.115.
Attendance and fees of witnesses.

A person is not required to attend as a witness in a proceeding before the board at a place more than 100 miles from the person’s place of residence, unless the person’s lawful mileage and fee for one day’s attendance is first paid or tendered to the person; but the testimony of a witness may be taken by deposition or interrogatories according to the Rules of Civil Procedure.

A witness summoned in a proceeding before the board or whose deposition is taken shall receive the same fees and mileage as a witness in the superior court.

History.

(§§ 23, 24 ch 193 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For court rules on depositions and interrogatories, see Rules 26 — 37, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure; for the court rule on witness fees, see Rule 7, Alaska Rules of Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.120.
Presumptions.

In a proceeding for the enforcement of a claim for compensation under this chapter it is presumed, in the absence of substantial evidence to the contrary, that

the claim comes within the provisions of this chapter;

sufficient notice of the claim has been given;

the injury was not proximately caused by the intoxication of the injured employee or proximately caused by the employee being under the influence of drugs unless the drugs were taken as prescribed by the employee’s physician;

the injury was not occasioned by the wilful intention of the injured employee to injure or kill self or another.

If delay in giving notice is excused by the board under AS

23.30.100(d)(2)

, the burden of proof of the validity of the claim shifts to the employee notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section.

The presumption of compensability established in (a) of this section does not apply to a mental injury resulting from work-related stress.

History.

(§ 9 ch 193 SLA 1959; am §§ 11, 13 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 21 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as a part of AS

23.30.100(d)(2)

. Renumbered in 1982.

Cross references. —

For the burden of proof in claims by sole proprietors or partners, see AS

23.30.239(c)

.

Sec. 23.30.121.
Presumption of coverage for disability from diseases for certain firefighters.

There is a presumption that a claim for compensation for disability as a result of the diseases described in (b) of this section for the occupations listed under (b) of this section is within the provisions of this chapter. This presumption of coverage may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. The evidence may include the use of tobacco products, physical fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from other employment or nonemployment activities.

For a firefighter covered under AS

23.30.243

,

there is a presumption that a claim for compensation for disability as a result of the following diseases is within the provisions of this chapter:

respiratory disease;

cardiovascular events that are experienced within 72 hours after exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances; and

the following cancers:

primary brain cancer;

malignant melanoma;

leukemia;

non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma;

bladder cancer;

ureter cancer;

kidney cancer; and

prostate cancer;

notwithstanding AS

23.30.100(a)

, following termination of service, the presumption established in (1) of this subsection extends to the firefighter for a period of three calendar months for each year of requisite service but may not extend more than 60 calendar months following the last date of employment;

the presumption established in (1) of this subsection applies only to an active or former firefighter who has a disease described in (1) of this subsection that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter has served in the state for at least seven years and who

was given a qualifying medical examination upon becoming a firefighter that did not show evidence of the disease;

was given an annual medical exam during each of the first seven years of employment that did not show evidence of the disease; and

with regard to diseases described in (1)(C) of this subsection, demonstrates that, while in the course of employment as a firefighter, the firefighter was exposed to a known carcinogen, as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer or the National Toxicology Program, and the carcinogen is associated with a disabling cancer.

The presumption set out in this section applies only to a firefighter who, at a minimum, holds a certificate as a Firefighter I by the Department of Public Safety under firefighter testing and certification standards established by the department under authority of AS

18.70.350

(1) or other applicable statutory authority.

The provisions of (b)(1)(A) and (B) of this section do not apply to a firefighter who develops a cardiovascular or lung condition and who has a history of tobacco product use as established under (e)(2) of this section.

The department shall, by regulation, define

for purposes of (b)(1) — (3) of this section, the type and extent of the medical examination that is needed to eliminate evidence of the disease in an active or former firefighter; and

for purposes of (d) of this section, the nature and quantity of a person’s tobacco product use; the standards adopted under this paragraph shall use or be based on existing medical research.

In this section, “firefighter” has the meaning given in AS

09.65.295

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For an additional presumption of compensability for certain firefighters contracting the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see § 15, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For an additional presumption of compensability for certain firefighters, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, peace officers, or health care providers contracting COVID-19 during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared January 15, 2021, see sec. 11, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 26, SLA 2008 provides that “[t]he presumption of coverage established by this [section] applies to claims made on or after August 19, 2008, even if the exposure leading to the occupational disease occurred before August 19, 2008.”

Sec. 23.30.122.
Credibility of witnesses.

The board has the sole power to determine the credibility of a witness.
A finding by the board concerning the weight to be accorded a witness’s testimony, including medical testimony and reports, is conclusive even if the evidence is conflicting or susceptible to contrary conclusions.
The findings of the board are subject to the same standard of review as a jury’s finding in a civil action.

History.

(§ 14 ch 93 SLA 1982)

Sec. 23.30.125.
Administrative review of compensation order.

A compensation order becomes effective when filed with the office of the board as provided in AS

23.30.110

, and, unless proceedings to reconsider, suspend, or set aside the order are instituted as provided in this chapter, the order becomes final on the 31st day after it is filed.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a decision or order of the board is subject to review by the commission as provided in this chapter.

If a compensation order is not in accordance with law or fact, the order may be suspended or set aside, in whole or in part, through proceedings in the commission brought by a party in interest against all other parties to the proceedings before the board. The payment of the amounts required by an award may not be stayed pending a final decision in the proceeding unless, upon application for a stay, the commission, on hearing, after not less than three days’ notice to the parties in interest, allows the stay of payment, in whole or in part, where the party filing the application would otherwise suffer irreparable damage. Continuing future periodic compensation payments may not be stayed without a showing by the appellant of irreparable damage and the existence of the probability of the merits of the appeal being decided adversely to the recipient of the compensation payments. The order of the commission allowing a stay must contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the commission and identified by reference to the evidence, that irreparable damage would result to the party applying for a stay and specifying the nature of the damage.

Proceedings for reconsidering, suspending, setting aside, or enforcing a compensation order, whether rejecting a claim or making an award, may not be instituted, except as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 20 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1965; am § 27 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 22 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 40 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Not all of ch. 2 of ch. 143, SLA 1959, as it relates to workmen’s compensation proceedings, has been repealed by implication.
For example, the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act is silent as to judicial review and the scope of judicial review. The Administrative Procedure Act, AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.650

, therefore applies, since there is nothing in the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act which covers the same ground or which is inconsistent with provisions in the Administrative Procedure Act relating to judicial review and the scope of such review. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.
But see Aleutian Homes v. Fischer, 418 P.2d 769 (Alaska 1966).

Sec. 23.30.127.
Appeals to commission.

A party in interest may appeal a compensation order issued by the board to the commission within 30 days after the compensation order is filed with the office of the board under AS

23.30.110

. The director may intervene in an appeal. If a party in interest is not represented by counsel and the compensation order concerns an unsettled question of law, the director may file an appeal to obtain a ruling on the question by the commission.

An appeal is initiated by filing with the office of the commission

a signed notice of appeal specifying the compensation order appealed from;

a statement of the grounds upon which the appeal is taken; and

other material the commission may by regulation require.

A cross-appeal may be initiated by filing with the office of the commission a signed notice of cross-appeal within 30 days after the decision is filed or within 15 days after service of notice of an appeal, whichever is later. The notice of cross-appeal shall specify the compensation order appealed from and the grounds upon which the cross-appeal is taken.

The office of the commission may charge a fee, not to exceed $100, for filing appeals and cross-appeals, except that the office of the commission may not charge a fee if the appellant is the state or a political subdivision of the state. The commission may require an appellant to pay the costs of the transcript of hearing and the preparation of the record on appeal. The commission may require cross-appellants or intervenors to share in the costs.

If a request for reconsideration of a board decision was timely filed with the office of the board, the notice of appeal must be filed within 30 days after the reconsideration decision is mailed to the parties or the date the request for reconsideration is considered denied in the absence of any action on the request, whichever is earlier.

The commission may require written briefs and make other rules and orders to facilitate the business of the commission and advance the prompt, fair, and just disposition of appeals.

History.

(§ 41 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Sec. 23.30.128.
Commission proceedings.

An appeal from a decision of the board under this chapter, and other proceedings under this section, shall be heard and decided by a three-member panel of the commission. An appeal panel of the commission must include the chair of the commission. The chair of the commission shall assign two members to each appeal, including one commission member classified as representing employees and one commission member classified as representing employers. Acts, decisions, and orders of the commission panel in the appeal or related proceeding shall be considered the acts, decisions, and orders of the full commission. The matter on appeal shall be decided on the record made before the board, a transcript or recording of the proceedings before the board, and oral argument and written briefs allowed by the commission. Except as provided in (c) of this section, new or additional evidence may not be received with respect to the appeal.

The commission may review discretionary actions, findings of fact, and conclusions of law by the board in hearing, determining, or otherwise acting on a compensation claim or petition. The board’s findings regarding the credibility of testimony of a witness before the board are binding on the commission. The board’s findings of fact shall be upheld by the commission if supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record. In reviewing questions of law and procedure, the commission shall exercise its independent judgment.

The commission may hold hearings and receive evidence on applications for (1) stays under AS

23.30.125

; (2) attorney fees and costs of appeal; (3) waiver of fees by indigent appellants; or (4) dismissal of appeals for failure to prosecute or upon settlement. The commission may rely on new or additional evidence presented during the hearing in making its decision on the application.

The commission may affirm, reverse, or modify a decision or order upon review and issue other orders as appropriate. The commission may remand matters it determines were improperly, incompletely, or otherwise insufficiently developed. The commission may remand for further proceedings and appropriate action with or without relinquishing the commission’s jurisdiction of the appeal. The administrative adjudication procedures of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) do not apply to the proceedings of the commission.

Within 90 days after written briefing on the appeal is completed or oral argument is held, whichever is later, the commission shall issue a decision in writing. The decision must contain a concise statement of reasons for the decision, including findings of fact, if required, and conclusions of law. The commission shall serve each party and the director with a copy of the decision. Appeals may be expedited for good cause by the commission. Unless reconsideration is ordered under (f) of this section, a decision under this subsection is the final commission decision.

A party or the director may request reconsideration of a decision issued under (e) of this section within 30 days after the date of service shown in the certificate of service of the decision. The request must state specific grounds for reconsideration. Reconsideration may be granted if, in reaching the decision, the commission (1) overlooked, misapplied, or failed to consider a statute, regulation, court or administrative decision, or legal principle directly controlling; (2) overlooked or misconceived a material fact; (3) misconceived a material question in the case; or (4) applied law in the ruling that has subsequently changed. The panel of the commission hearing the request for reconsideration shall consist of the same members of the panel that issued the decision. The commission may issue an order for reconsideration of all or part of the decision upon request of a party or the director. Reconsideration is based on the record, unless the commission allows additional argument. The power to order reconsideration expires 60 days after the date of service, as shown on the certificate of service, of a decision issued under (e) of this section. If the commission does not issue an order for reconsideration within the time allowed for ordering reconsideration, a request for reconsideration is considered denied. If reconsideration is ordered, the commission shall issue a decision within 30 days after the close of the record on reconsideration. The commission shall serve each party in the case with a copy of the decision upon reconsideration. The decision upon reconsideration is the final commission decision.

A decision of the commission becomes final on the

31st day after the date of service of a decision if reconsideration is not requested;

61st day after the date of service of a decision if reconsideration is requested but an order for reconsideration is not issued; or

date of service of the commission decision upon reconsideration under (f) of this section if reconsideration is requested and an order for reconsideration is issued.

History.

(§ 41 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Sec. 23.30.129.
Judicial review of commission orders.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

44.62.560

, orders of the commission may not be appealed to the superior court. Consistent with AS

22.05.010(b)

, final decisions of the commission may be appealed to the supreme court, and other orders may be reviewed by the supreme court as provided by the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

A finding by the commission concerning the weight to be accorded a witness’s testimony, including medical testimony and reports, is conclusive even if the evidence is conflicting or susceptible to contrary conclusions. The commission’s findings of fact may be reversed on appeal if not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

History.

(§ 41 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.130.
Modification of awards.

Upon its own initiative, or upon the application of any party in interest on the ground of a change in conditions, including, for the purposes of AS

23.30.175

, a change in residence, or because of a mistake in its determination of a fact, the board may, before one year after the date of the last payment of compensation benefits under AS

23.30.180

,

23.30.185

,

23.30.190

,

23.30.200

, or

23.30.215

, whether or not a compensation order has been issued, or before one year after the rejection of a claim, review a compensation case under the procedure prescribed in respect of claims in AS

23.30.110

. Under AS

23.30.110

the board may issue a new compensation order which terminates, continues, reinstates, increases, or decreases the compensation, or award compensation.

A new order does not affect compensation previously paid, except that an award increasing the compensation rate may be made effective from the date of the injury, and if part of the compensation due or to become due is unpaid, an award decreasing the compensation rate may be made effective from the date of the injury, and payment made earlier in excess of the decreased rate shall be deducted from the unpaid compensation, in the manner the board determines.

History.

(§ 21 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 252 SLA 1976; am § 23 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.135.
Procedure before the board.

In making an investigation or inquiry or conducting a hearing the board is not bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure, except as provided by this chapter. The board may make its investigation or inquiry or conduct its hearing in the manner by which it may best ascertain the rights of the parties. Declarations of a deceased employee concerning the injury in respect to which the investigation or inquiry is being made or the hearing conducted shall be received in evidence and are, if corroborated by other evidence, sufficient to establish the injury.

All testimony given during a hearing before the board shall be recorded, but need not be transcribed unless further review is initiated. Hearings before the board shall be open to the public.

History.

(§ 22 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1965)

Cross references. —

For regulations establishing rules of evidence for hearings before the board, see 8 AAC 45.120.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section and AS

23.30.115

cover much the same ground as AS

44.62.430

,

44.62.440

and

44.62.460

of the earlier Administrative Procedure Act.
This would have been unnecessary if the intent had been that the Administrative Procedure Act should govern the procedure for hearings in workers’ compensation hearings. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

The legislature intended the board to follow the separate and later set of statutory provisions in AS

23.30.005

—

23.30.270

(now AS

23.30.005

—

23.30.400

) in conducting its hearings and the earlier provisions regarding the applicability of § 4, ch. 143, SLA 1959, to Alaska Industrial Board proceedings have been repealed by implication. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

The Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act makes no mention of a hearing officer.
Therefore, none is required in proceedings under that act. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

Sec. 23.30.140.
Appointment of guardian by court.

The director may require the appointment of a guardian or other representative by a competent court for any person who is mentally incompetent or a minor to receive compensation payable to the person under this chapter and to exercise the powers granted to or to perform the duties required of the person under this chapter. If the director does not require the appointment of a guardian to receive the compensation of a minor, appointment for this purpose is not necessary.

History.

(§ 10 ch 193 SLA 1959; § 7(4)(c) ch 193 SLA 1959; § 8(2) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 42 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.